Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,109
Streams with need for instream flows; identification; study.

Each natural resources district and the Game and Parks Commission shall conduct studies to identify specific stream segments which the district or commission considers to have a critical need for instream flows. Such studies shall quantify the instream flow needs in the identified stream segments. Any district or the Game and Parks Commission may request the assistance of the Conservation and Survey Division of the University of Nebraska, the Game and Parks Commission, or any other state agency or the Chief Water Officer in order to comply with this section.

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 25;

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 141;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 124.